Utah statutes.
20A-13-302.   Certificate of election.

(1)  The lieutenant governor shall transmit certificates of election to each of the electors selected by the political party whose candidates for president and vice president received the highest number of votes in Utah.

(2)  Presidential electors may not receive compensation for their services.

